Mississippi statutes. Title 95. Torts
Chapter 9. Liability Exemption for Volunteers and Sports Officials

§ 95-9-1.
Definitions; liability exemption for volunteers; exceptions.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Qualified volunteer” means any person who freely provides services, goods or the use of real or personal property or equipment, without any compensation or charge, to any volunteer agency in connection with a volunteer activity. For purposes of this chapter, reimbursement of actual expenses, including travel expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of a member’s duties, insurance coverage and workers’ compensation coverage of volunteers, shall not be considered monetary compensation.

“Volunteer agency” means any department, institution, community volunteer organization or any nonprofit corporation designated 501(c)(3) by the United States Internal Revenue Service, except an agency established primarily for the recreational benefit of its stockholders or members. Volunteer agency shall also include any volunteer firefighter association which is eligible to be designated as a nonprofit corporation under 501(c)(3) by the United States Internal Revenue Service.

“Volunteer activity” means any activity within the scope of any project, program or other activity regularly sponsored by a volunteer agency with the intent to effect a charitable purpose or other public benefit, including, but not limited to, fire protection, rescue services, the enhancement of the cultural, civic, religious, educational, scientific or economic resources of the community or equine activity as provided in Section 95-11-1 et seq.

A qualified volunteer shall not be held vicariously liable for the negligence of another in connection with or as a consequence of his volunteer activities.

A qualified volunteer who renders assistance to a participant in, or a recipient, consumer or user of the services or benefits of a volunteer activity shall not be liable for any civil damages for any personal injury or property damage caused to a person as a result of any acts or omissions committed in good faith except:

Where the qualified volunteer engages in acts or omissions which are intentional, willful, wanton, reckless or grossly negligent; or

Where the qualified volunteer negligently operates a motor vehicle, aircraft, boat or other powered mode of conveyance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 585, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 589, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 443, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 385, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2013).

§ 95-9-3.
Liability exemption for sports officials; definitions; exceptions; application of section.

Sports officials who officiate athletic contests at any level of competition in this state shall not be liable to any person or entity in any civil action for injuries or damages claimed to have arisen by virtue of actions or inactions related in any manner to officiating duties within the confines of the athletic facility at which the athletic contest is played.

For purposes of this section, sports officials are defined as those individuals who serve as referees, umpires, linesmen and those who serve in similar capacities but may be known by other titles and are duly registered or members of a local, state, regional or national organization which is engaged in part in providing education and training to sports officials.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to grant the protection set forth to sports officials who cause injury or damage to a person or entity by actions or inactions which are intentional, willful, wanton, reckless, malicious or grossly negligent.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1988.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 585, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 95-9-5.
Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the liability of a person acting outside the scope of the volunteer activity, or as limiting a person’s right of recovery under provisions required to be contained in an automobile liability insurance policy or contract pursuant to Sections 83-11-101 through 83-11-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the liability of the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle shall not be limited as provided in this chapter for purpose of recovery under such a provision.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 585, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.